DI-35
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DI1ID-06

DTC P0115/22 | Water Temp. Circuit Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

A thermistor built into the water temp. sensor changes the resistance value according to the water tempera-
ture.

The structure of the sensor and connection to the engine ECU is the same as in the intake air temp. circuit
malfunction shown on page DI-28.

If the engine ECU detects the DTC P0115/22, it operates the fail safe function in which the water temperature
isassumedtobe80 °C (176 °F).

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area
* Open okshastin waies.c aipr ss2Rser citcuit
P0115/22 Open okshartin wate... .temy +sensoreiteuit0.5 sec. ormore.. ..«\Watertemp. sensor
*EngineECU
HINT:
AfterconfirmingDTC P0115/22usethehand  —heldtesterto confirmthe watertemp. from CURRENT DATA.
Temperature Displayed Malfunction
-40°C (- 40°F) Open circuit
140°C (284°F) ormore Short circuit
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

. Readfreezeframedatausinghand -heldtester. Becausefreeze framerecordsthe engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air —fuelratioleanorrich, etc. atthetime
of the malfunction.

. IfDTC”P0105/31” (Vacuum Sensor Circuit Malfunction), ’P0110/24” (Intake Air Temp. Circuit Malfunc-
tion), ’P0115/22” (Water Temp. Circuit Malfunction), ’P0120/41” (Throttle Position Sensor Circuit Mal-
function) are output simultaneously, E2 (Sensor Ground) may be open.
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When using hand-held tester

1 Connect the hand-held tester, and read value of water temperature.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.

CHECK:

Read temperature value on the hand-held tester.

OK:

Same as actual water temperature

HINT:

« If there is open circuit, hand-held tester indicates — 40° C (- 40°F).
« Ifthere is short hand- held tester indicates 140° C (284°F) or more.

@

NG>

-40°C (-40°F) .... Go to step 2.
140° C (284°F) or more .... Go to step 4.

Check for intermittent problem
(See page DI-4).

2 | Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

@ON

BE6653
A00365

Water temp. Sensor

Engine ECU

A00366

e ]
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PREPARATION:

(@) Disconnect the water temp. sensor connector.
(b) Connectsensor wire harnessterminals together.
(c) Turntheignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Readtemperaturevalueonthehand -heldtester.

OK:

Temperature value: 140° C (284 ° F) or more

OK>

Confirm good connection at sensor. If OK, re-
place water temp. sensor.
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3 | Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

@ON

Water Temp. Sensor

Engine ECU
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BE6653
FI7057

PREPARATION:

P24389 A02348

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Connect between terminals THW and E2 of engine ECU

connector.
HINT:

Water temperature sensor connector is disconnected. Before
checking, do a visual and contact pressure check for the engine

ECU connector (See page IN-19).
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:

Readtemperature value onthe hand
OK:

Temperature value: 140°C (284 ° F) or more

—-held tester.

repair or replace harness.

0K>

Open in harness between terminals E2 or THW,

@

If OK, replace engine ECU.

Confirm good connection at engine ECU.

4 | Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

N
@O

Water Temp. Sensor

Engine ECU

BE6653

A00372 A00373

B

1FZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM619E)

PREPARATION:

(@) Disconnect the water temp. sensor connector.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON.
CHECK:

Readtemperature value onthe hand
OK:

—heldtester.

Temperaturevalue: -40°C (- 40°F)

ox )

Replace water temp. sensor.
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5 | Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

@ON

Water Temp. Sensor

Engine ECU

BE6653 E12 Connector

FI7056

A02261 A02608
NG

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E12 connector of engine ECU.
HINT:
Water temp. sensor connector is disconnected.
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand-held tester.
OK:
Temperature value: - 40°C (- 40°F)

0K> Repair or replace harness or connector.

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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When not using hand-held tester

1 | Check voltage between terminals THW and E2 of engine ECU connector.

/~5\ON PREPARATION:
\@ (&) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
—————— CHECK:
%DDDDUDDDDDD JOCADORIIN000000000( - . ]
‘DLDD%DDDHJ@%LD LO0O00000 Measure voltage between terminals THW and E2 of engine
W ECU connecter.
OK:
THW (+) E2 (-)
BE6653 Water Temperature Voltage
P24389 A02349 20°C (68°F) (Engine is cool) 05-34V
80°C (176°F) (Engine is hot) 02-10V
OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI-4).
NG

2 | Check water temp. sensor.

PREPARATION:

Disconnect the water temp. sensor connecter.

CHECK:

Measure resistance between terminals.

OK:

Resistance is within Acceptable Zone on chart.
Water Temperature Resistance
20°C (68°F) (Engine is cool) 2-3kQ

505502 80°C (176°F) (Engine is hot) 0.2 - 0.4 kQ

NG> Replace water temp. sensor.
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3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
water temp. sensor (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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